indomorph/hin/adjs-exceptions.lexc
!!!Irregular adjective surface form entries for Hindi (Hand-written)!!!
Multichar_Symbols
!Morphological properties
+Adj
+Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl +Dir +Obl

LEXICON Root
! These do not inflect even though they end in -आ /aː/
! There can be a lot more, just listing those on HindiGrammarSketch
ज़्यादा Number ; ! /zjaːdaː/
ज़िंदा Number ; ! /zindaː/
पैदा Number ; ! /paidaː/
बढ़िया Number ; ! /bəɽ̥ijaː/
सवा Number ; ! /savaː/

LEXICON Number
+Sg:0 Gender ;
+Pl:0 Gender ;

LEXICON Gender
+Masc:0 Case ;
+Fem:0 Case ;

LEXICON Case
+Dir:0 # ;
+Obl:0 # ;
